Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1052.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-420.06, to read: START_STATUTE36-420.06. Assisted living homes and centers; mild hyperbaric oxygen therapy; physician orders; notice; informed consent; rules A. Notwithstanding any other law, assisted living homes and assisted living centers may offer mild hyperbaric oxygen therapy to their residents through the use of a class II mild hyperbaric oxygen chamber that has received premarket notification clearance from the United States food and drug administration for home use as prescribed by or under the direction of a physician and from which residents are able to independently extricate themselves. B. An assisted living home or assisted living center that offers mild hyperbaric oxygen therapy to its residents pursuant to this section shall: 1. Ensure that the use of the mild hyperbaric oxygen therapy by residents is provided only on the order of a physician. 2. Ensure that a staff member who has received training approved by the manufacturer is on-site any time a resident receives mild hyperbaric oxygen therapy. 3. Provide a notice to each resident who receives mild hyperbaric oxygen therapy that the United States food and drug administration has approved the device to treat mild symptoms consistent with acute mountain sickness and that any other use is considered off-label. The notice shall provide known information about contraindications and risks of using the device and recommend that the resident consult the resident's treating physician about any personal health risks. C. An assisted living home or assisted living center may not offer mild hyperbaric oxygen therapy to a resident who requires directed care services unless the therapy is provided on the order of the resident's treating physician and the resident or the resident's authorized representative provides informed consent. D. The department may adopt any necessary rules for the purposes of this section. END_STATUTE